Illinois, session 104th, SB2402.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the PRIOR 5Act. 6    Section 5. Declaration of public policy.7    (a) The General Assembly finds the following:8        (1) requiring individuals to qualify for, apply for, 9    and receive a license before he or she works in an 10    occupation imposes a significant burden on individuals, 11    the State, and the economy;12        (2) the creation of new occupational licenses without 13    sufficient empirical evidence or legislative oversight may 14    compel the Department of Financial and Professional 15    Regulation to expend finite resources administering 16    regulations that are not necessary to protect public 17    health or safety;18        (3) occupational licenses should only be required or 19    expanded if it is necessary to protect public health and 20    safety from significant and discernible harm21        (4) the people of the State have a fundamental right 22    to pursue a lawful occupation; and23        (5) it is necessary to require comprehensive reviews   SB2402- 2 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1    of any proposed legislation that would create an 2    occupational license, expand the scope of practice for a 3    license, or increase personal qualifications for a license 4    so that the General Assembly can analyze whether the 5    legislation is both necessary to protect public health, 6    safety, or welfare from significant and discernible harm 7    and appropriate in light of the burdens it creates. 8    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    (a) "Department" means the Department of Financial and 10Professional Regulation.11    (b) "Least restrictive regulation" means the following, 12from least to most restrictive:13        (1) market competition;14        (2) third-party or consumer-created ratings and 15    reviews;16        (3) private certification;17        (4) voluntary bonding or insurance;18        (5) specific private civil cause of action to remedy 19    consumer harm;20        (6) deceptive trade practice act;21        (7) mandatory disclosure of attributes of the specific 22    good or service;23        (8) regulation of the process of providing the 24    specific good or service;25        (9) regulation of the facility where the specific good   SB2402- 3 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1    or service is sold;2        (10) inspection;3        (11) bonding;4        (12) insurance;5        (13) government registration;6        (14) government certification;7        (15) specialty occupational certification solely for 8    medical reimbursement; and9        (16) an occupational license.10    (d) "License" means the privilege conferred by the 11Department to a person that has fulfilled all the requirements 12for any type of licensure under this Act.13    (e) "Licensure" means a process by which the Department 14grants to a person who has met certain prerequisite 15qualifications the right to perform prescribed professional or 16occupational tasks and to use the title of the profession or 17occupation.18    (f) "Occupational regulation" means a statute, rule, 19practice, policy, or other state law that allows an individual 20to an occupational title or work in an occupation. 21"Occupational regulation" includes a government registration, 22government certification, and occupational license.23    (g) "Personal qualifications" means criteria related to an 24individual's personal background and characteristics. 25"Personal qualifications" may include one or more of the 26following: (i) completion of an approved educational program,   SB2402- 4 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1(ii) satisfactory performance on an examination, (iii) work 2experience, (iv) apprenticeship, (v) other evidence of 3attainment of requisite knowledge and skills, (vi) passing a 4review of the individual's criminal record, or (vii) 5completion of continuing education.6    (h) "Pre-Regulatory Impact Application" means the 7application for review of legislation to regulate an 8unregulated profession or occupation or modify the respective 9scope thereof.10    (i) "Pre-Regulatory Impact Assessment and Report" means 11the process as provided in this Act by which designated staff 12shall assess the Pre-Regulatory Impact Application.13    (j) "Scope of practice" means the procedures, actions, 14processes, and work that an individual may perform under an 15occupational regulation. 16    Section 15. Establishment of a Pre-Regulatory Impact 17Assessment.18    (a) A Pre-Regulatory Impact Assessment shall be completed 19and presented to the General Assembly before legislation 20creating a new occupational regulation, expanding the scope of 21practice of a licensed occupation, or increasing the personal 22qualification for an occupational regulation can be voted on 23by a committee or the General Assembly.24    (b) On or before the first day of the General Assembly's 25legislative session, the Speaker of the House of   SB2402- 5 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1Representatives, the President of the Senate, and the Chair of 2each relevant committee shall assign to the relevant committee 3or legislative staff the responsibility to analyze legislation 4creating a new occupational regulation, expanding the scope of 5practice of a licensed occupation, or increasing the personal 6qualifications for an occupational regulation and the 7accompanying Pre-Regulatory Impact Application submitted by 8proponents of the legislation. 9    Section 20. Pre-Regulatory Impact Application and 10Assessment process.11    (a) The designated staff are responsible for (i) reviewing 12legislation that requires a Pre-Regulatory Impact Assessment 13pursuant to Section 15 to ensure the least restrictive 14regulation is being proposed and (ii) preparing a 15Pre-Regulatory Impact Assessment that shall be considered with 16the legislation by the General Assembly.17    (b) A proponent of a piece of legislation shall submit a 18Pre-Regulation Impact Application to the designated staff. The 19application shall include:20        (1) the name or type of occupation that is proposed to 21    be licensed, proposed changes to an existing license's 22    scope of practice or required personal qualifications, and 23    the full range and variety of practices and activities, 24    modes of practice, or subspecialities included in the 25    scope of practice covered by the legislation;  SB2402- 6 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1        (2) demonstrable evidence of significant and 2    discernible harm arising from the full range and variety 3    of practices and activities included in the scope of 4    practice and how the legislation will remedy this harm;5        (3) the substance, content, and relevance of the 6    personal qualifications required for entry into the 7    occupation that the legislation seeks to regulate, 8    including, but not limited to, required hours, knowledge 9    areas tested in examinations, the development process for 10    creating examinations, and any updates that have been made 11    to address changes in technology or modes of practice;12        (4) the extent to which the personal qualifications 13    that the legislation requires for individuals to enter the 14    occupation being regulated are necessary to protect the 15    public from significant and discernible harm for all 16    activities covered by the scope of practice;17        (5) equity concerns arising from the personal 18    qualifications and costs, including:19            (A) the financial impact on aspiring licensees, 20        including, but not limited to:21                (i) itemization of average costs of achieving 22            personal qualifications; 23                (ii) an assessment of average incomes of 24            licensees; 25                (iii) numbers, monetary loss, and demographics 26            of individuals who start but do not achieve   SB2402- 7 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1            personal qualifications or complete the 2            application process; and3                (iv) the educational or training programs that 4            exist and the cost of such educational or training 5            programs;6            (B) the challenges for individuals from 7        historically disadvantaged backgrounds in acquiring 8        required personal qualifications;9            (C) the barriers for individuals with records of 10        interactions with the criminal justice system;11            (D) any evidence of challenges for individuals who 12        do not speak English as their primary language;13            (E) the geographic distribution of educational 14        programs, training sites, and test sites;15            (F) how the proposed regulation will affect the 16        costs of goods and services; and17            (G) whether licensure renewal will be based only 18        upon payment of a fee or whether renewal will involve 19        continuing education, reexamination, or other 20        methodologies;21        (6) whether any current protections exist for 22    consumers of the goods and services provided by the 23    unregulated occupation and how they protect or fail to 24    protect consumers;25        (7) the approximate number of individuals or 26    businesses that would be subject to the legislation, a   SB2402- 8 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1    list of associations, organizations, and other groups 2    available to practitioners of occupation, and, if 3    applicable, the existence of national or private 4    accreditations or certification systems for the profession 5    or occupation;6        (8) a list of all State and federal laws that have been 7    enacted to protect the public with respect to the 8    profession or occupation and how the proposed standards 9    for licensure compare to the standards of these other 10    jurisdictions;11        (9) a description of any known previous efforts in 12    this State to implement legislation to regulate the 13    profession or occupation or an expansion of scope of 14    practice or required personal qualifications thereof;15        (10) the form, powers, and composition of a licensing 16    board, if needed; and17        (11) any other information the designated staff 18    requests for the analysis of the regulatory proposal or 19    proposed legislation.20    (c) The designated staff may request information from 21State agencies that contract with individuals in regulated 22occupations and others knowledgeable of the occupation, 23labor-market economics, or other factors, including costs and 24benefits.25    (d) The designated staff shall determine in the 26Pre-Regulatory Impact Assessment if the proposed occupational   SB2402- 9 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1regulation meets the State's policy of using the least 2restrictive regulation necessary to protect consumers from 3significant and discernible harm and provide a written 4recommendation regarding the necessity of the legislation.5    (e) The designated staff's analysis shall use a rebuttable 6presumption that consumers are sufficiently protected by the 7remedies listed in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection 8(g) of this Section.9    (f) The designated staff may rebut the presumption in 10subsection (e) if it finds (i) credible empirical evidence of 11significant and discernible harm and (ii) that consumers do 12not have the information and means to protect themselves 13against such harm. If evidence of such unmanageable harm is 14found, the designated staff will recommend the least 15restrictive government regulation to address the harm, as 16listed in paragraphs (5) through (11) of subsection (g) of 17this Section.18    (g) For any harm under subsection (f), the designated 19staff shall use the following guidelines to form the 20recommendation in the Pre-Regulatory Impact Assessment:21        (1) If the harm arises from contractual disputes, 22    including pricing disputes, staff may recommend enacting a 23    specific civil cause of action in small-claims court or 24    district court to remedy consumer harm. This cause of 25    action may provide for reimbursement of the attorney's 26    fees or court costs, if a consumer's claim is successful;  SB2402- 10 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1        (2) If the harm arises from fraud, staff may recommend 2    strengthening powers under the state's deceptive trade 3    practices acts or requiring disclosures that will reduce 4    misleading attributes of the specific good or service;5        (3) If the harm arises from general health and safety 6    risks, staff may recommend enacting a regulation on the 7    related process or requiring a facility license;8        (4) If the harm arises from unclean facilities, staff 9    may recommend requiring periodic facility inspections;10        (5) If the harm arises from a provider's failure to 11    complete a contract fully or to standards, staff may 12    recommend requiring the provider to be bonded;13        (6) If the harm arises from a lack of protection for a 14    person who is not a party to a contract between providers 15    and consumers, staff may recommend requiring the provider 16    have insurance;17        (7) If the harm arises from transactions with 18    transient, out-of-state, or fly-by-night providers, staff 19    may recommend requiring the provider register its business 20    with the secretary of state;21        (8) If the harm arises from a shortfall or imbalance 22    in the consumer's knowledge about the good or service 23    relative to the provider's knowledge, staff may recommend 24    enacting government certification;25        (9) If the harm arises from an inability to qualify 26    providers of new or highly-specialized medical services   SB2402- 11 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1    for reimbursement by the state, staff may recommend 2    enacting a specialty certification solely for medical 3    reimbursement;4        (10) If the harm arises from a systematic information 5    shortfall in which a reasonable consumer of the service is 6    permanently unable to distinguish between the quality of 7    providers and there is an absence of institutions that 8    provide guidance to consumers, staff may recommend 9    enacting an occupational license; and10        (11) If the harm arises from the need to address 11    multiple types of harm, staff may recommend a combination 12    of regulations. This may include a government regulation 13    combined with a private remedy including third-party or 14    consumer-created ratings and reviews, or private 15    certification.16    (h) The designated staff's recommendation shall include a 17written analysis of the need for the occupational regulation 18and shall address the following:19        (1) each factor in paragraph (5) of subsection (b), 20    including the effects of the legislation on opportunities 21    for workers, consumer choices, costs and benefits, general 22    unemployment, market competition, governmental costs, and 23    any other perceived effects;24        (2) the type of occupational regulation recommended, 25    if any, including the proper scope of practice for the 26    occupation and the requisite personal qualifications;  SB2402- 12 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1        (3) penalties for violating the proposed regulation; 2    and3        (4) whether the legislation requires the creation of a 4    new board and how much responsibility the legislation 5    delegates to a licensing board or agency, including 6    whether the board or agency would have to promulgate rules 7    and have increased costs to regulate the occupation.8    (i) The designated staff shall have a minimum of 9 months 9from receipt of the Pre-Regulatory Impact Application to 10complete the analysis and issue the Pre-Regulatory Impact 11Assessment.12    (j) The Pre-Regulatory Impact Assessment shall be 13considered with the applicable legislation when it is 14considered by the relevant legislative committees and the 15General Assembly. 16    Section 25. Temporary moratorium on the creation of new 17occupational regulations.18    (a) Except as provided for in subsection (d) of this 19Section, beginning January 1, 2026, no Pre-Regulatory Impact 20Application shall be submitted and the General Assembly shall 21not consider legislation governed by this Act until January 1, 222027.23    (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, a political subdivision 24shall promulgate rules imposing new licensure requirements 25until the moratorium in this Section is repealed.  SB2402- 13 -LRB104 10371 AAS 20446 b1    (c) The moratorium in this Section shall be repealed on 2January 1, 2027 unless otherwise extended by the General 3Assembly.4    (d) A political subdivision may initiate a Pre-Regulatory 5Impact Application during the moratorium period if it can 6provide evidence of significant and discernible harm related 7to the unregulated practice of the occupation. 8    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 9severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.